California, session 20252026, AB1527.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12012.119 is added to the Government Code, to read:12012.119. (a) The fourth amendment between the State of California and the Picayune Rancheria of Chukchansi Indians of California, executed on June 4, 2025, entered into in accordance with the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of 1988 (18 U.S.C. Secs. 1166 to 1168, inclusive, and 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq.), is hereby ratified.(b) (1)   In deference to tribal sovereignty, none of the following shall be deemed a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code):(A) The execution of a tribal-state gaming compact ratified by this section.(B) The execution of an amended tribal-state gaming compact ratified by this section.(C) The execution of an intergovernmental agreement between a tribe and a county or city government negotiated pursuant to the express authority of, or as expressly referenced in, a tribal-state gaming compact or amended compact ratified by this section.(D) The execution of an intergovernmental agreement between a tribe and the Department of Transportation, or other state agency, negotiated pursuant to the express authority of, or as expressly referenced in, a tribal-state gaming compact or amended compact ratified by this section.(E) The on-reservation impacts of compliance with the terms of a tribal-state gaming compact or amended compact ratified by this section.(2) Except as expressly provided in this section, this subdivision does not exempt a city, county, or city and county, or the Department of Transportation, or any state agency or local jurisdiction, from the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to enhance the economic development, stability, and self-sufficiency of the Picayune Rancheria of Chukchansi Indians of California, and to protect the interests of this tribe and its members, the surrounding communities, and the California public at the earliest possible time, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.